Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 7. EARLY VOTING

SUBTITLE B. SPECIAL FORMS OF EARLY VOTING

CHAPTER 104. VOTING ON ELECTION DAY BY DISABLED VOTER FROM VOTING SYSTEM PRECINCT

Sec. 104.001. ELIGIBILITY. A qualified voter in whose precinct polling place voting is conducted by voting machine is eligible to vote by the early voting procedure provided by this chapter if the voter has a sickness or physical condition that prevents the voter from voting in the regular manner without personal assistance or a likelihood of injuring the voter's health.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1107 (H.B. 2309), Sec. 2.02, eff. January 1, 2006.

Sec. 104.002. FORM AND CONTENTS OF APPLICATION. An application for a ballot voted under this chapter must:

(1) be in the form of an affidavit; and

(2) include, in addition to the information required by the applicable provisions of Section 84.002, a statement that the applicant has not previously voted in the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 104.003. TIME AND PLACE FOR VOTING. Voting under this chapter shall be conducted on election day, beginning at 7 a.m. and concluding at 7 p.m., at the main early voting polling place. However, if the early voting ballots voted by mail are processed at a location other than the main early voting polling place, the early voting clerk may require the voting to be conducted at that location.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1157, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 104.004. VOTING PROCEDURE. (a) On submission of an application to the early voting clerk, the clerk shall review the application and verify the applicant's registration status in accordance with the procedure applicable to early voting by mail.

(b) The voting shall be conducted with the balloting materials for early voting by mail.

(c) The voter must mark and seal the ballot in the same manner as if voting by mail except that the certificate on the carrier envelope need not be completed.

(d) On sealing the carrier envelope, the voter must give it to the clerk, who shall note on the envelope that the ballot is voted under this chapter.

(e) If the voter is physically unable to enter the early voting polling place without personal assistance or a likelihood of injuring the voter's health, the clerk shall deliver the balloting materials to the voter at the polling place entrance or curb following the procedures prescribed by Section 64.009.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 84, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (S.B. 477), Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 104.005. PROCESSING RESULTS. The results of voting under this chapter shall be processed in accordance with the procedures applicable to processing early voting ballots voted by mail.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 104.006. ENTRY ON EARLY VOTING ROSTER. The early voting roster must include the name of each person voting under this chapter with a notation indicating that the person voted under this chapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.29; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.